Missouri, session 2026, SB853.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.180, 137.275, 137.385, and
138.180, RSMo, are repealed and four new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.180, 137.275, 137.385,
and 138.180, to read as follows:
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the
valuation of any real property he shall forthwith notify the
record owner of such increase, either in person, or by mail
directed to the last known address; every such increase in
assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to
review by the county board of equalization whereat the
landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to
the landowner shall so state.
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a
charter form of government, other than any county adopting a
charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June [fifteenth] first of such increase and, in
a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the
record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 853 2
from such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed
to the last known address; every such increase in assessed
valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall
be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner
shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of
January of the year following receipt of software necessary
for the implementation of the requirements provided under
subsections 4 and 5 of this section from the state tax
commission, for any county not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section
137.355, whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation
of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June [fifteenth] first of the
previous assessed value and such increase either in person,
or by mail directed to the last known address and include in
such notice a statement indicating that the change in
assessed value may impact the record owner's tax liability
and provide all processes and deadlines for appealing
determinations of the assessed value of such property. Such
notice shall be provided in a font and format sufficient to
alert a record owner of the potential impact upon tax
liability and the appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following
receipt of software necessary for the implementation of the
requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5
of this section from the state tax commission, for all
counties not subject to the provisions of subsection 2 of
this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever

SB 853 3
any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real
property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June [fifteenth] first of such increase and, in
a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the
record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result
from such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed
to the last known address; every such increase in assessed
valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall
be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner
shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from
the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation
from the assessor.
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required
under subsections 2 and 4 of this section, from the county
shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel
number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political
subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual
tax levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a tax
upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the
record owner;

SB 853 4
(6) The contact information for each political
subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates
for political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property
of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided
by the political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the
taxpayer.
6. In addition to the requirements provided under
subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this section, effective January
1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and
with more than one million inhabitants, whenever any
assessor shall notify a record owner of any change in
assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that
information regarding the assessment method and computation
of value for such property is available on the assessor's
website and provide the exact website address at which such
information may be accessed. Such notification shall
provide the assessor's contact information to enable
taxpayers without internet access to request and receive
100 information regarding the assessment method and computation
101 of value for such property.
137.275. Every person who thinks himself aggrieved by
the assessment of his property may appeal to the county
board of equalization, in person, by attorney or agent, or
in writing. Such appeals shall be lodged with the county
board of equalization on or before the [second] first Monday
in [July] August.
137.385. Any person aggrieved by the assessment of his
property may appeal to the county board of equalization. An
appeal shall be in writing and the forms to be used for this

SB 853 5
purpose shall be furnished by the county clerk. Such appeal
shall be lodged with the county clerk as secretary of the
board of equalization before the [second] first Monday in
[July] August; provided, that the board may in its
discretion extend the time for filing such appeals.
138.180. Any person may appeal in writing to the board
of equalization from the assessment of his property, which
appeal shall specify the matter of which he complains and
which shall be filed at the office of the assessor of the
city on or before the [second] first Monday in [July] August
of each year, and any person so appealing shall have the
right of appeal from decisions of the local board to the
state tax commission as provided by law. There shall be no
presumption that the assessor's valuation is correct.
✓